Hawaii statutes.
§606-12 Duties of official court reporters.
[(a)] The duties of each official court reporter shall be to attend sessions
of the court and take verbatim notes of all oral proceedings before the court,
including the testimony of witnesses, objections of counsel, offers of proof,
arguments of counsel, rulings of the court, charge to the jury, verdict of the
jury, and any other matter which the court may require the official court
reporter to report. The official court reporter may be called upon at any time
during a hearing, by any party to the same, or by the court, to read aloud any
portion of the official court reporter's notes taken by the official court
reporter. The official court reporter may be referred to at any time by the
clerk of the court for the exact language of any orders from the bench. In any
hearing of probate of will or administration matter, the judge, in the judge's
discretion, may order the official court reporter to supply and file, without
charge and within a reasonable time, a certified statement of such testimony as
relates to the names, ages, and genealogies of heirs. Other appropriate duties
for the official court reporters to perform may be prescribed by rule of court.

[(b)] Each official court reporter shall file
the official court reporter's notes with the clerk of the court and when
requested by any party to a cause and so directed by the court or by the court
of its own motion, within a reasonable time thereafter as the court may
designate, shall furnish a certified transcript of the official court reporter's
notes, or any portion thereof, taken in the cause, upon the payment of the fee
fixed in section 606-13. The official court reporter may furnish a transcript
of any of the official court reporter's notes, where the same is not intended
for the purposes of appeal, upon the request of any party, without the order of
the judge therefore first obtained.

[(c)] In an ex parte or uncontested case, if
there is no official court reporter in attendance, the court may direct the
clerk to take notes of the oral evidence adduced, or the judge may personally
take notes or may cause the oral evidence to be preserved on tape or by another
mechanical device. [L 1915, c 88, §2; RL 1925, §2300; RL 1935, §3699; RL 1945,
§9732; RL 1955, §218-12; am L 1959, c 110, §3; HRS §606-12; am L 1972, c 88,
§4(i), (j); gen ch 1985; am L 1996, c 226, §2; am L 2004, c 202, §60; am L
2006, c 94, §1; am L 2010, c 109, §1]

Rules of Court

Generally, see Rules Governing Court Reporting.

Recording of testimony and proceedings, see RCC rule 25.1;
RDC rule 25.1.

Transcript as evidence, see HRCP rule 80; order for
transcript of evidence, see RCC rule 25 and RDC rule 25.

Case Notes

"Any party" in the provision that the reporter may
furnish a transcript where it is not intended for appeal upon the request of
any party construed. 59 H. 237, 580 P.2d 58 (1978).

Court reporter's notes as public record, public's right of
access to such records. 59 H. 237, 580 P.2d 58 (1978).

Section does not preclude recording of a closing argument.
67 H. 231, 683 P.2d 1217 (1984).

Trial court must order that the closing argument be recorded
when a party makes a timely request to do so. 71 H. 347, 791 P.2d 392 (1990).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next